Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

General Provisions

66-21-101. Enforcement of liens where method not prescribed.

Any and all liens given by statute on personal property, except attorney's lien, where no method of enforcing the same is specifically prescribed by statute, may be enforced by original attachment issued by any court having jurisdiction of the amount claimed to be due without necessity of fiat, on affidavit that the debt is due and unpaid, to be levied on the property upon which the lien exists, be it either in the hands of the creditor, owner, or other party not an innocent purchaser.

Acts 1889, ch. 12, § 1; Shan., § 5330; mod. Code 1932, § 8042; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2101.

Cross-References. Damages assessed against tracts of land for lateral drains connecting to levee and drainage improvements, §69-6-718.

Enforcement of tax liens, title 67, ch. 5, part 24.

Lien on land for maintenance and/or administration certificates of drainage or levee districts, §69-6-918.

Liens on land restored from coal mining, §59-8-302.

Tax liens, title 67, ch. 5, part 21.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 24; 18 Tenn. Juris., Liens, §§ 3, 11.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1977).

66-21-102. Lien book furnished to register.

It is imperative that the county legislative body purchase and furnish to the register of each county a well-bound book to be known as and labeled “Lien Book,” in which all pages shall be blank except the index pages described in §66-21-103.

Code 1932, § 8058; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2102.

Law Reviews.

The New Tennessee Code (Charles C. Trabue), 10 Tenn. L. Rev. 155 (1932).

66-21-103. Form and contents of lien book.

The register shall enter in the notebook the time of reception, and record in the lien book or a combined lien book, all abstracts, memoranda or certified copies of judgments, decrees, lis pendens, mechanics' or furnishers' liens, and such other liens as are required or authorized to be recorded. The register shall also enter in the notebook the time of reception of the release of any lien of record and record the release in the lien book.

The register shall index the recordings of liens and releases and shall note the nature of the lien in the index. The register shall have discretion to maintain a separate direct and reverse index, or to combine the index with the federal lien direct and reverse index or to combine it with the other indexes of the office in a master direct and reverse index.

Code 1932, § 8059; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2103; Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 7.

66-21-104. Notation of time of filing.

The register shall note in the notebook the date, hour and minute of receiving each instrument evidencing or releasing a lien.

In any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand six hundred (32,600) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the register shall note on each such abstract, memorandum or copy the date, hour and minute of the filing.

Code 1932, § 8060; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2104; Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 8; 1990, ch. 902, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

66-21-105. Public official's contest of lien, encumbrance, or other document that constitutes cloud on title of real property interest.

As used in this section, “public official” means:

An individual who is a current or retired elected or appointed government official, including a state, county, metropolitan, or municipal official;

An individual who is the head of a division or major unit or department within an agency or office of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state, county, metropolitan, or municipal government, regardless of the title of the position, and who, as a substantial part of the individual's duties, provides meaningful input on the development of policy goals or the implementation of policy;

A high-ranking employee within the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state, county, metropolitan, or municipal government who has a primary responsibility for one (1) or more of the following functions:

Public information and legislative affairs;

Fiscal, budget, and audit matters;

Legal, security, or internal affairs;

Information technology systems; and

Human resources;

A first responder, as defined in § 29-34-203; or

A law enforcement officer, as defined in § 39-11-106.

A public official who is the subject of a lien, encumbrance, or any other document that reasonably constitutes a cloud on the title of a real property interest, filed with the register of any county, may file with the register a notarized affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, that contains:

A recital designating the type of instrument, office, book, and page number of the instrument;

The affiant's mailing address;

A statement that the affiant is a public official;

A statement that the affiant believes that the document was filed without any reasonable basis or legal cause, and the affiant's factual basis for why the filed document lacks any reasonable basis or legal cause; and

A statement that the affiant is not filing the affidavit contesting any document held by any entity listed in subsection (k).

The secretary of state shall adopt a form of affidavit for use under subdivision (b)(1) and a form of certification for use under subsection (f).

Once an affidavit is filed with the register pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the register shall indicate on any available indices that the document referenced in subdivision (b)(1)(A) is “Contested — Under Review.”

Within three (3) business days of filing an affidavit filed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the public official shall send a copy of the affidavit, by registered or certified mail, with return receipt requested, addressed to the filing party at the address listed on the lien, encumbrance, or other document.

The copy of the affidavit is deemed delivered upon:

Acceptance by the filing party;

A showing that the filing party refused to accept delivery and it is so stated in the return receipt of the United States postal service; or

The United States postal service returning the affidavit as undeliverable or unclaimed.

The refusal or failure of the filing party to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail, or the refusal or failure to sign the return receipt, does not affect the validity of delivery of the affidavit, and a filing party who refuses or fails to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail is charged with knowledge of the contents of the affidavit.

Within twenty (20) business days of delivery of the affidavit to the filing party or refusal or failure to sign the return receipt, or notice by the United States postal service that the affidavit is undeliverable, a filing party who believes in good faith that the lien, encumbrances, or other document was filed with a reasonable basis or legal cause, may file an action seeking a determination in the chancery court of the county where the document was filed pursuant to title 29, chapter 14. The action must name the public official as an interested party in its caption.

A petition filed pursuant to subdivision (e)(1) must set forth the factual basis showing that the filed lien, encumbrance, or other document was filed with a reasonable basis or legal cause, and must be accompanied by a cost bond in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200).

Any person who shares a property interest with the public official that is adversely affected by the filed lien, encumbrance, or other document may join in the action as an interested party.

Following a reasonable period for responsive pleadings and discovery, the chancellor shall preside over a hearing at which proof may be offered on the issues raised and shall make a determination and issue a decree as to whether the lien, encumbrance, or other document was filed with any reasonable basis or legal cause at the close of the proceedings.

If, within twenty (20) business days of delivery of the affidavit to the filing party under subdivision (d), a petition and cost bond has not been filed as required by subdivision (e)(2), the public official may file with the register a certification, signed by the public official under penalty of perjury and verified by the clerk and master, stating that no petition has been filed.

If the lien, encumbrance, or other document described in subdivision (b)(1) does not contain the name or address of the filing party, plaintiff, complainant, lienor, or owner of the lien, the public official may file with the register a certification, signed by the public official under penalty of perjury stating that the aforementioned name or address was not available.

Any certification filed pursuant to subdivision (f)(1) or (f)(2) must include a recital designating the type of instrument, office, book, and page number of the instrument identifying the lien, encumbrance, or other document referenced in the affidavit filed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) and shall serve as a release of the lien, encumbrance, or other document.

If, following the hearing on a petition filed under subsection (e), the chancellor determines that there is reasonable basis or legal cause for the filing of the document, the filing party may file a final, unappealable court decree with the register, and the register shall remove the “Contested — Under Review” indication from the public records and the effectiveness of the lien, encumbrance, or other document must be reflected as the original date of filing.

If, following the hearing on a petition filed under subsection (e), the chancellor determines that the lien, encumbrance, or other document was filed without any reasonable basis or legal cause, the public official may file a final, unappealable court decree with the register which shall serve as a release of the lien, encumbrance, or other document.

The prevailing party in any action filed pursuant to subsection (e), including any person sharing a property interest with the public official, may recover costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees that are incurred in the action.

Any governmental entity, as defined in § 29-20-102, may elect to insure or indemnify any public official for the cost of defending and removing liens, encumbrances, or other documents as described in this section, or any financing statements similarly filed and challenged pursuant to § 47-9-513(e), and for any other costs related to defending and removing a lien, encumbrance, or other document, but not including consequential damages. Any insurance or indemnification pursuant to this subsection (j) must be upon terms and conditions as the governmental entity establishes.

This section providing for affidavits filed by public officials contesting liens, encumbrances, or other documents that reasonably constitute a cloud on the title of a real property interest does not apply to liens, encumbrances, or other documents if the originator, owner, or holder of the debt is any of the following:

A state or national bank or trust company insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or an operating subsidiary of such a bank or trust company;

A state or federal credit union insured by the national credit union administration;

A residential mortgage lender or an industrial loan and thrift company licensed by the Tennessee department of financial institutions;

An entity regulated by the federal farm credit administration;

The federal housing administration (FHA);

A federal home loan bank;

The federal national mortgage association (FannieMae);

The federal home loan mortgage corporation (FreddieMac);

The federal agricultural mortgage corporation (FarmerMac);

The veterans administration (VA); or

Any lien, encumbrance, or other document that is filed with the register, where the mortgage electronic registration system is listed as the nominee for the originator, owner, or holder of the debt.

Acts 2018, ch. 913, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-21-105 (Acts 1897, ch. 96, § 4; Code 1932, § 8061; Shan., § 4714a4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2105), concerning marginal releases, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 9.

Acts 2018, ch. 913, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to liens, encumbrances, or other documents, regardless of when filed.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 913, § 2. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 1, 2018.

66-21-106. Penalty for failure to release.

If the plaintiff, complainant, lienor or owner of any lien filed and registered pursuant to this part fails, neglects or refuses to release a lien that is satisfied, within fifteen (15) days after written demand of the defendant or lienee, such person shall be liable to the penalty prescribed for failure to release a mortgage on demand after the payment of the debt secured.

Code 1932, § 8063; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2106.

Cross-References. Penalty for failure to release lien created by recorded instrument, §66-25-102.

66-21-107. Originals filed under prior law.

Any original instrument evidencing a lien filed under prior law shall be maintained until released or until the lien has lapsed.

Code 1932, § 8062; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2107; Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 10.

66-21-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 2018, ch. 1042, § 1; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 142, § 1, effective April 5, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-21-108 (Code 1932, § 8064; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2108), concerning failure of register to perform duties, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 636, § 11.

Former §66-21-108 concerned recovery for a real property owner who prevails in action challenging validity of lien.

66-21-109. Certified copies of records as evidence.

A copy of the abstract, memorandum or copy, as released or unreleased, certified by the register, shall be received as evidence in any court or tribunal.

Acts 1897, ch. 96, § 5; Shan., § 4714a5; mod. Code 1932, § 8065; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-2109.

66-21-110. Tolling of limitations period for perfection or enforcement of liens against debtor in bankruptcy.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if due to the filing of a bankruptcy petition under title 11 of the United States Code (11 U.S.C.), a creditor is stayed from filing the necessary documents to create or enforce a lien or security interest against the debtor's property, then any statute of limitations created or established by law for the perfection or enforcement of a lien or security interest shall be tolled until ninety (90) days after any of the following actions occur with respect to the filing of the bankruptcy petition:

The stay is lifted as to the creditor;

The case is discharged; or

The case is dismissed.

Acts 2006, ch. 684, § 1.

66-21-111 — 66-21-120. [Reserved.]

In any county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand six hundred (32,600) nor more than thirty-two thousand seven hundred (32,700) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census the record of liens so provided may be released by the plaintiff, complainant, lienor or owner of the lien, or such person's attorney of record, entering in the blank space under the record of such lien the words “Released in full,” or their equivalent, dating and signing the same, which entry shall be witnessed in writing on the record by the register or the register's deputy, for which service the register is entitled to a fee of three dollars ($3.00) to be paid by the lienor, unless the contract provides otherwise.

Acts 1990, ch. 902, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Entry of certificate of release, §66-25-206.

Release of liens created by written instrument, title 66, ch. 25.